Mississippi, session 2026, HB1626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The State Department of Education shall approve those courses to be made available to public school students through distance learning and online classes through the Mississippi Online Course Approval (MOCA) in the Office of Curriculum and Instruction.  The department may approve only those online classes that have received accreditation, and public funds may not be used to defray the cost of any distance learning or online course that is not accredited. SECTION 2.  Section 37-67-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-67-1.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Distance Learning Collaborative Act of 2016." (2)  As used in this section: (a)  "Distance learning" means a method of delivering education and instruction on an individual basis to students who are not physically present in a traditional setting such as a classroom.  Distance learning provides access to learning when the source of information and the learners are separated by time and distance, or both.  Distance learning courses that require a physical on-site presence for any reason other than taking examinations may be referred to as hybrid or blended courses of study. (b)  "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Education. (c)  A "distance learning collaborative" means a school or schools that write and submit an application to participate in the voluntary distance learning program.  A distance learning collaborative is comprised, at a minimum, of a public school district, and may include an agency or other nonprofit organization approved by the State Department of Education to provide distance learning resources. (d)  A "lead partner" is a public school district or other nonprofit entity with the instructional expertise and operational capacity to manage the Distance Learning Collaborative Program as described in the approved application for funds.  The lead partner serves as the fiscal agent for the collaborative and shall disburse awarded funds in accordance with the collaborative's approved application.  The lead partner ensures that the collaborative adopts and implements the Distance Learning Collaborative Program consistent with the standards adopted by the State Board of Education.  The public school district shall be the lead partner if no other qualifying lead partner is selected. (3)  Effective with the 2016-2017 school year, the Mississippi State Department of Education shall establish a voluntary distance learning grant program which shall be a collaboration among the entities providing distance learning services for students.  The Distance Learning Collaborative Program shall provide financial assistance to encourage and improve distance learning education services in rural areas through the use of telecommunications, computer networks and related advanced technologies to be used by students, teachers and rural residents.  Grants are for projects where the benefit is primarily delivered to end users who are not at the same location as the source of the education service. (4)  Distance Learning Collaborative Grants may be used to: (a)  Acquire the following types of equipment:  (i) computer hardware and software; (ii) audio and video equipment; (iii) computer network components; (iv) terminal equipment; (v) data terminal equipment; (vi) inside wiring; (vii) interactive video equipment; and (viii) other facilities that further distance learning technology services. (b)  Acquire instructional programming for distance learning programs. (c)  Acquire technical assistance and instruction for using eligible equipment. (d)  The cost of tuition and fees for students to participate over and above the available federal Perkins Loans or Stafford Loans which are loaned directly to qualifying students to assist in covering the cost of distance learning funding. (e)  Any interest charges that accumulate during a student's degree program for the utilization of distance learning services. (5)  Subject to the availability of funds appropriated therefor, the State Department of Education shall administer the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of the voluntary Distance Learning Collaborative Program, including awards and the application process.  The department shall establish a rigorous and transparent application process for the awarding of funds.  Lead partners shall submit the application on behalf of their distance learning collaborative.  The department will establish monitoring policies and procedures that shall include at least one (1) site visit per year.  The department will provide technical assistance to collaboratives and their providers to improve the quality of distance learning services.  The department will evaluate the effectiveness of each distance learning collaborative. (6)  Distance Learning Collaborative Program funds shall be awarded to distance learning collaboratives whose proposed programs meet the program criteria established by the State Board of Education which shall include the following: (a)  Distance learning programs shall be approved and registered with the State Department of Education and course content must be aligned with state standards. (b)  Distance learning instructors shall complete professional development training in online methodology and technical aspects of web-based instruction, and may be credentialed by the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards (NBPTS). (c)  Transcript equivalency of grades between online and traditional classes.  Student enrollment and credits awarded shall be made in accordance with regulations jointly approved by the State Board of Education, the Mississippi Community College Board and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (d)  Curriculum standards for online courses. (e)  Classroom "seat time" requirements for online courses. (f)  Accountability for student achievement, including methods to assess online course completion rates. (7)  A teacher, assistant teacher or other employee whose salary and fringe benefits are paid from state funds allocated for the Distance Learning Collaborative Program shall only be classified as a state or local school district employee eligible for state health insurance benefits or membership in the Public Employees' Retirement System, if the person's employer is already a public school district or an agency or instrumentality of the state, and the employee would be eligible for such benefits in the normal course of business. (8)  Funding shall be provided for the Distance Learning Collaborative Program beginning with the 2016-2017 fiscal year subject to appropriation by the Legislature, and the Legislature may appropriate funds to implement the program on a phased-in basis.  The State Department of Education may receive and expend contributions and funding from private sources for the administration and implementation of the Distance Learning Collaborative Program.  In the initial phase of implementation, the State Department of Education shall award state funds based on a community's capacity, commitment and need in order to encourage and improve distance learning services in rural areas.  The department shall make an annual report to the Legislature and the Governor regarding the effectiveness of the Distance Learning Collaborative Program, and the PEER Committee shall review those reports and other program data and submit an independent evaluation of the program operation and effectiveness to the Legislature and the Governor on or before October 1 of the calendar year before the beginning of the next phased-in period of funding.  The State Department of Education shall reserve no more than five percent (5%) of the appropriation in any year for administrative costs.  Funds remaining after awards to distance learning collaboratives may be carried over in the following year. (9)  The lead partner of a distance learning collaborative and the local school district shall compile information about online learning programs for high school students to earn college credit and place the information on its website.  Examples of information to be compiled and placed on the website include links to providers of approved online learning programs, comparisons among various types of online programs regarding awarding of credit, advantages and disadvantages of online learning programs, and other general assistance and guidance for students, teachers and counselors in selecting and considering online learning programs. Public high schools shall ensure that teachers and counselors have information about online learning programs for high school students to earn college or university credit and are able to assist parents and students in accessing the information.  Distance learning collaboratives shall ensure that parents and students have opportunities to learn about online learning programs under this section. SECTION 3.  Section 37-68-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-68-7.  (1)  There is established the Equity in Distance Learning Grant Program which shall be administered by the department for the purpose of reimbursing schools for eligible expenses incurred in funding their distance learning plans, and in facilitating safe classroom and remote instruction. (2)  Subject to appropriations by the Legislature, allocations to schools shall be made based on net enrollment, as defined in Section 37-151-201.  For any school not funded under the total funding formula, the department shall calculate the net enrollment equivalent or fund the school based on enrollment. (3)  Subject to the provisions of this chapter, and other applicable federal law and regulations, schools shall have the authority to use the funds provided in this grant program in a way which best facilitates their distance learning plan, and safe classroom or remote instruction. (4)  Schools are highly encouraged to commit a portion of their federal ESSER funds, above the amount required by Section 37-68-11(b), as supplemental matching funds to offset the total cost of purchasing sufficient electronic devices, technological supports and systems of service for its distance learning plan. SECTION 4.  Section 37-161-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-161-3.  (1)  The Legislature finds and declares the following: (a)  Meeting the educational needs of children in our state's schools is of the greatest importance to the future welfare of the State of Mississippi; (b)  Closing the achievement gap between high-performing students, including the achievement gap among at-risk students, is a significant and present challenge; (c)  Providing a broader range of educational options to parents and utilizing existing resources, along with technology, may help students in the state improve their academic achievement; and (d)  Many of the state's school districts currently lack the capacity to provide other public school choices for students whose schools are low performing. (2)  There is created the Mississippi Virtual Public School Program, which is the responsibility of the State Department of Education.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Mississippi Virtual Public School established under this section provides Mississippi families with an alternative choice to access additional educational resources in an effort to improve academic achievement.  The Mississippi Virtual Public School must be recognized as a public school and provide equitable treatment and resources as are other public schools in the state.  Private providers, overseen by the State Department of Education, may be selected by the State Board of Education to administer, manage or operate virtual school programs in this state, including the total operation of the Mississippi Virtual Public School Program.  Any private provider chosen to provide services under the provisions of this subsection shall be chosen through the Mississippi Online Course Application Process. (3)  Nothing in this section may be interpreted as precluding the use of computer- and Internet-based instruction for students in a virtual or remote setting utilizing the Mississippi Virtual Public School. (4)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases have the meanings respectively ascribed unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Mississippi Virtual Public School" means a public school in which the state uses technology in order to deliver instruction to students via the Internet in a virtual or remote setting. (b)  "Sponsor" means the public school district is responsible for the academic process for each student, including, but not limited to, enrollment, awarding of credit and monitoring progress. (5)  (a)  The State Board of Education shall establish the Mississippi Virtual Public School beginning in school year 2006-2007. (b)  Students who enroll in the Mississippi Virtual Public School may reside anywhere in the State of Mississippi. (6)  Subject to appropriation, the Mississippi Virtual Public School shall provide to each student enrolled in the school all necessary instructional materials.  Subject to appropriation, the sponsored school must ensure that each student is provided access to the necessary technology, such as a computer and printer, and to an Internet connection for schoolwork purposes. (7)  The Mississippi Department of Education shall have approval authority for all coursework and policy of the Mississippi Virtual Public School. (8)  Each teacher employed by or participating in the delivery of instruction through the Mississippi Virtual Public School must meet all qualifications for licensure in the State of Mississippi. (9)  Any student who meets state residency requirements may enroll in the Mississippi Virtual Public School. (10)  Enrollment in the Mississippi Virtual Public School shall be free of charge to students.  The costs associated with the operations of the virtual school must be shared by the State Department of Education, subject to appropriation, and/or the local school districts.  Once the State Department of Education appropriation and the local school district budgeted funds for Mississippi Virtual Public School have been expended and students choose to enroll in online courses, the costs of the online courses may be the responsibility of the students' parents or guardians. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.